Missouri, session 2026, HB2986.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 452.300, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 452.300, to read as follows:
452.300. 1. The rules of the supreme court and other applicable court rules shall
govern all proceedings pursuant to sections 452.300 to 452.415.
2. A proceeding for dissolution of marriage, legal separation, or declaration of
invalidity of marriage shall be entitled: "In re the Marriage of ______ and ______".
3. The initial pleading in an original proceeding pursuant to sections 452.300 to
452.415 shall be denominated a "petition" and the responsive pleading in an original
proceeding shall be denominated an "answer". Other pleadings in an original proceeding and
all pleadings in other proceedings pursuant to sections 452.300 to 452.415 shall be
denominated as provided in the rules of the supreme court and other applicable court rules.
4. Any party who files the initial pleading in an original proceeding pursuant to
sections 452.300 to 452.415 shall be denominated the "petitioner" and any party who is
required to file or who files a responsive pleading in an original proceeding shall be
denominated the "respondent". Each party shall retain such denomination from the original
proceeding in any other proceedings pursuant to sections 452.300 to 452.415.
5. An original proceeding pursuant to sections 452.300 to 452.415 shall be
commenced in the county in which the petitioner resides or in the county in which the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2986 2
respondent resides. If an original proceeding is commenced in the county in which the
petitioner resides, upon motion by the respondent filed prior to the filing of a responsive
pleading, the court in which the proceeding is commenced may transfer the proceeding to the
county in which the respondent resides if:
(1) The county in which the respondent resides had been the county in which the
children resided during the ninety days immediately preceding the commencement of the
proceeding; or
(2) The best interest of the children will be served if the proceeding is transferred to
the county in which the respondent resides because:
(a) The children and at least one parent have a significant connection with the county;
and
(b) There is substantial evidence concerning the present or future care, protection and
personal relationships of the children in the county.
6. In proceedings pursuant to sections 452.300 to 452.415, "judgment" shall include a
"decree".
7. Any minor who was legally married prior to August 28, 2025, may file a
petition for dissolution of marriage, legal separation, or declaration of invalidity of
marriage under sections 452.300 to 452.415 without the consent of his or her custodial
parent or guardian.
✔